Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1628.01
County or district health department; termination; procedure.

A county or district health department established under sections 71-1626 to 71-1636 may be terminated, following a public hearing, by a majority vote of the county board members for any county having a health department or of the majority of county boards having a district health department. A city-county health department may be terminated as provided by the agreement between the county and the city.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 3, p. 554;

R.S.1943, § 71-1628;

Laws 1949, c. 206, § 1(2), p. 593;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 37;

Laws 1997, LB 185, § 2.